District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.281

Department of Behavioral Health Enterprise Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Department of Behavioral Health Enterprise Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department of Behavioral Health (“Department”) in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of revenue from the following fees, proceeds, and revenues collected from the following activities and operations:

(1)

Proceeds from the cafeteria managed and operated by the Department on the St. Elizabeths Hospital Campus;

(2)

Fees charged for trainings and Continuing Education Units by the Department’s Organizational Development- DMH Training Institute; and

(3)

Recoupment and collection of housing bridge subsidy payments from individual consumers, representative payees, and landlords by the Department’s Adult Services Supported Housing program.

(c)

The Fund shall be used for the management and operation of the food cafeteria, DMH Training Institute, and Supported Housing programs managed and operated by the Department.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5042, 61 DCR 9990

History

For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 5042 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 5042 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 5042 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Emergency Legislation